Arkansas, session 2025, SB583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-92-507, concerning Maximum Allowable
Cost Lists relating to pharmacy services, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(h)(1) A pharmacy, pharmacist, or business providing pharmacy services
may pursue a private right of action for violations of this section and for
provided remedies, including without limitation compensatory damages, actual
financial losses, and punitive damages under:
(A) The Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.;
(B) The Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act,
§ 23-92-501 et seq.; and
(C) The Trade Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et seq.
(2) In any private cause of action as described in subdivision
(h)(1) of this section, a prevailing pharmacy, pharmacist, or business
*JMB608*
04-03-2025 09:21:47 JMB608

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB583
providing pharmacy services may recover attorney's fees and all costs
incurred in pursuing the action.
(3) A pharmacy, pharmacist, or business providing pharmacy
services pursuing a violation of this section under the Trade Practices Act,
§ 23-66-201 et seq., may recover statutory damages of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) per violation.
(4) The private right of action created in this section does not
permit an action against any government, governmental agency, or governmental
official.

/s/C. Tucker

























04-03-2025 09:21:47 JMB608